Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-284
Town lots; section, how construed.

Section 76-283 shall be construed to apply to rights acquired previous to the entry of the land; and in no case to the rights of parties acquired under or by virtue of any tax sale.

Laws 1867, § 2, p. 94;

R.S.1913, § 6283;

C.S.1922, § 5802;

C.S.1929, § 76-803;

R.S.1943, § 76-284.